Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1938SV (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 553 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 461A.10A Restrictions on acquiring 1 real property. 2 1. The department shall not acquire real property available 3 for sale at a public auction for real property. The department 4 shall only acquire real property from a willing donor or 5 willing seller, who shall not be under any compulsion by the 6 department. The department shall not acquire real property for 7 more than appraised value from a nonprofit corporation that 8 directly purchased real property for sale at a public auction. 9 2. For purposes of this section, âauctionâ includes but is 10 not limited to an auction by electronic means, an auction by 11 sealed bid, or a conventional oral auction. 12 Sec. 2. Section 461A.11, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 1. The commission may accept gifts of land or other 15 property, subject to section 461A.10, or the use of lands or 16 other property for a term of years, and improve and use the 17 land as public state parks. 18